California statutes. Education Code
(b) The staffing of the unit shall at all times be composed of an appropriate number of full-time employees, including the State Supervisor of Agricultural Career Technical Education and the Assistant State Supervisor of Agricultural Career Technical Education. The State Supervisor of Agricultural Career Technical Education shall, under the direction of the Superintendent, assume responsibility for the administration of the state program adopted under this article throughout the public school system as
 well as the articulation of the state program to the requirements and mandates of federally assisted career technical education. The Assistant State Supervisor of Agricultural Career Technical Education shall, under the direction of the State Supervisor of Agricultural Career Technical Education, assume responsibility for the coordination of the state program of agricultural career technical education adopted under this article and the coordination of the activities of student agricultural organizations and associations.

(c) (1) An appropriate number of employees of the department shall serve as regional program consultants in agricultural career technical education in a manner that ensures statewide coverage. Duties of a regional program consultant in agricultural career technical education include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Providing
 technical assistance to school districts, including teachers, counselors, principals, superintendents, and others as needed to develop, maintain, and strengthen local agricultural programs.

(B) Assisting with the administration of local agricultural programs, including collecting information relating to program participation, interacting with and serving as a point of contact for local educational agencies, participating in regional or state meetings, and serving on committees and task forces, as assigned.

(C) Identifying, conducting, or overseeing professional development opportunities for teachers to improve teacher performance and better integrate agriculture into the curriculum.

(D) Organizing career technical student organization activities that promote leadership development for all pupils, including serving as
 a regional advisor for pupil officers.

(E) Acting as a liaison between the department, local educational agencies, postsecondary educational institutions, business and industry groups in agriculture-related fields, and other agencies providing agricultural education.

 (2) Each regional program consultant shall be geographically located within the region for which the regional program consultant is assigned, and to the extent possible, geographically located in those areas most readily accessible to the school districts they assist.

(d) The department shall accomplish the staffing of the agricultural career technical education unit in compliance with this article by prioritizing the use of funding provided pursuant to the federal Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act (Perkins V) (Public
 Law 115-224) for this purpose and by reassigning priorities in staff assignments within the department in a manner that will not result in new costs to the state as a consequence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 51, Sec. 40.   (SB 75)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

52453.

(a) The State Director of Career Technical Education shall establish and convene an Agricultural Advisory Committee representative of the various and diverse areas of the agricultural industry in California.

(b) The committee shall be composed of the following:

(1) A representative from a university conducting teacher training in career technical agriculture.

(2) A representative from a community college conducting career technical education in agriculture.

(3) A representative from a high school conducting a program of career technical education in agriculture.

(4) A representative from a school conducting general education in agriculture.

(5) A parent of a pupil enrolled in career technical education in agriculture.

(6) Nine other individuals representing diverse agricultural interests from various geographic locations in the state.

The State Supervisor of Agricultural Education shall serve as the committee consultant.

(c) It shall be the purpose of this committee to advise, in an ongoing manner, the State Supervisor of Agricultural Education, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and the State Board of Education on policy matters pertaining to the state program of agricultural career technical education. The advice of the committee shall include, but not be limited to, the development of a curriculum and a strategy for the purpose of establishing a source of trained and qualified individuals in agriculture, a strategy for articulating the state program in agricultural career technical education throughout the state school system, and a consumer education outreach strategy regarding the importance of agriculture in California.

(d) The committee shall serve without compensation, including travel and per diem and shall operate in accordance with the established policies of the State Department of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52454.

(a) The curriculum of school districts that choose to participate in the state program of agricultural career technical education shall include all of the following components:

(1) Organized classes in the study of agricultural science and technology.

(2) A student-supervised occupational experience program in agriculture.

(3) A program of leadership, organization, and personal development.

(b) Student learning activity developed to supplement these components shall be considered curricular and shall contribute to the grade of the participating student when those activities are integral to assisting the student to achieve the career objective of the class or course.

It is the intent of the Legislature that opportunities are provided for teachers to be employed on a 12-month basis in order to maintain supervised occupational experience on a year-round basis for students enrolled in agricultural career technical programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Agricultural Career Technical Education Incentive Program [52460. - 52462.]

52460.

The governing board of a school district which operates an agricultural career technical education program may apply to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for an incentive grant, pursuant to this article, for the purpose of purchasing or leasing agricultural career technical education equipment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 87.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52461.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall award grants to applicant school districts which meet the following requirements:

(a) The school district shall contribute an amount of funds equal to the amount of the grant to the purchase or lease of equipment for use in agricultural career technical education programs.

(b) The school district shall certify to the Superintendent of Public Instruction that the grant funds received and the matching funds contributed by the district shall be used solely for the purpose of purchasing or leasing equipment for use in agricultural career technical education programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 88.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52461.5.

(a) For purposes of this article, “agricultural career technical education equipment” shall mean any nonsalary item of expenditure, including, but not limited to, capital outlay, for approved agricultural career technical education programs.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any requirement of this article or any other provision chaptered during the 1983–84 fiscal year that school districts contribute local matching funds to be eligible for state funds for nonsalary costs of career technical agriculture programs may be waived by the Superintendent of Public Instruction if he or she finds that a matching requirement would create a financial hardship for any school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52462.

The State Board of Education may, with the advice of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, adopt rules and regulations governing the distribution of funds provided for purposes of this article and shall adopt criteria for assessing whether school districts have met the requirements of Section 52461.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1461, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Adult Schools [52500. - 52621.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [52500. - 52524.]

52500.

Adult schools and evening high schools shall consist of classes for adults. Minors may be admitted to those classes pursuant to board policy and Section 52500.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1193, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

52500.1.

(a) Adult schools shall consist of programs, courses, and classes for adults. Minors may be admitted to those programs, courses, and classes pursuant to governing board policy and this section.

(b) Eligibility of high school pupils for enrollment in adult education programs, courses, and classes shall be limited to pupils who meet both of the following conditions:

(1) High school pupils who enroll in adult education programs, courses, and classes pursuant to Section 41976, except that high school pupils shall not be counted for adult education apportionment purposes.

(2) High school pupils who
 have completed a counseling session that involved the pupil, a certificated representative of the high school, and the pupil’s parent or guardian, and who have a school record that contains written documentation of the session and a statement that the pupil is voluntarily enrolling in the adult education program, course, or class, and that enrollment in an adult education program, course, or class will enhance the pupil’s progress toward meeting the educational requirements for graduation from high school. Commencing July 1, 1994, a school district shall not enroll high school pupils pursuant to this subdivision unless the school district complies with the conditions set forth in this subdivision.

(c) Money for the Adult Education Program, established pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 84900) of Chapter 5 of Part 50 of Division 7 of Title 3, shall not be used to support the costs of adult education programs, courses, and classes
 described in this section. A school district shall clearly demonstrate that the costs of instruction for persons under 18 years of age enrolled in an adult education program, course, or class described in this section are from another allowable fund source or sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 50.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52501.

The governing board of a school district maintaining secondary schools shall have power with the approval of the department to establish and maintain classes for adults, except programs and classes in outdoor science education and conservation education, as the term is employed in Section 8760, for the purpose of providing instruction in classes and courses defined in Section 41976.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 51.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52501.3.

Each governing board maintaining classes for adults shall meet the requirements set forth in Sections 35145, 41010, 41011, 41015, 41020, 42103, 42600, 51040, 51041, 51050, and 51056.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

52501.5.

Revenue derived from the Adult Education Program, established pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 84900) of Chapter 5 of Part 50 of Division 7 of Title 3, shall not be expended for other than adult education purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 52.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52502.

The governing board of a high school district or unified school district may establish classes for adults. If these classes result in enrollment in any school year of 500 or more students, such districts shall establish an adult school for the administration of the program, if one is not established. This section shall not prohibit the governing board of a high school district or unified school district from establishing an adult school at an enrollment threshold in classes for adults lower than 500 students for any school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 53.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52503.

The governing board of a high school district or unified school district may establish and maintain one or more adult schools by resolution of the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52504.

Classes for adults shall conform to any course of study and graduation requirements otherwise imposed by law or under the authority of law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52505.

Such classes may be convened at such hours and for such length of time during the day or evening and at such period and for such length of time during the school year as may be determined by the governing authority. The governing board of any high school district or unified school district may provide for the maintenance of these classes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 54.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52506.

The department shall establish standards including standards of attendance, curriculum, administration, and guidance and counseling service for these classes as a basis for the several apportionments of state funds provided herein for the support of these classes. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall prepare, distribute, and maintain a detailed handbook for use by the local educational agencies. The handbook shall contain course approval criteria, implementation plans for administrative regulations, and procedures for securing course and program approvals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 135.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

52507.

Governing boards shall have the authority to provide for granting appropriate credits, certificates, diplomas or other recognition of skill or accomplishment in such classes which such districts are otherwise authorized to grant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52508.

The governing board of a high school district or a unified school district shall have the authority to award diplomas or certificates to adults and eligible minors enrolled in adult schools upon satisfactory completion of a prescribed course of study in an elementary school program.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52509.

The governing board of any school district maintaining an adult school shall prescribe the requirements for the granting of diplomas.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52511.

Whenever the governing board of a school district maintaining an adult school or classes for adults is unable to maintain the school or classes in the school district because of its inability to secure a teacher or teachers, or because of lack of facilities, the governing board of the school district may, with the approval of the county superintendent of schools and the Superintendent, maintain the school or classes of the school district elsewhere than within the school district or contract for instruction of the students in an adult school or classes with the governing board of another school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 40.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

52514.

High schools maintained in any state institution for adults or in any city, county, or city and county jail, road camp or farm shall consist only of classes for adults.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52515.

State funds shall not be apportioned to a school district unless the courses have been approved by the department pursuant to Section 41976.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 59.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52517.

(a) A high school or unified school district shall report for attendance in a class if either of the following occurs:

(1) The school district receives full compensation for the class from any public or private agency, individual, or group of individuals, except fees authorized by Section 52612.

(2) The class is not located in a facility clearly identified in a manner, and established by appropriate procedures, to ensure that attendance in the class is open to the general public, unless the class is authorized pursuant to Section 52570 or located in a state hospital.

(b) The state board may adopt
 regulations as may be necessary to enforce this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 61.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52523.

Adult education programs, courses, and classes shall not be used to supplant the regular high school curriculum for high school pupils enrolled in adult education. Adult education shall supplement and enrich the high school pupil’s educational experiences. Therefore, adult education, at a minimum, shall meet the following criteria:

(a) All programs, courses, and classes conducted as adult education shall be open to adults and listed in the school district’s catalog of adult education classes provided to the public and shall be under the supervision and jurisdiction of the adult education administrator as determined by the governing board of the school district. Adults shall have priority over other students for admission to any adult education class if those adults enroll not later than
 the regular enrollment period for those classes. The enrollment period shall be published in the course catalog. A course required by the school district for high school graduation or necessary for pupils to maintain satisfactory academic progress shall not be offered exclusively through the adult education program. An adult for purposes of this section is a person 18 years of age or older or other person who is not concurrently enrolled in a regular high school program.

(b) Each adult education teacher, whether part time or full time, under contract status or in an hourly position, shall be part of the adult school faculty and shall be under the direct supervision of the authorized adult education administrator.

(c) Enrollment of high school pupils shall be voluntary on the part of the pupil taking the class. Before enrollment by a high school pupil in an adult education program,
 class, or course, the pupil shall have documentation of the counseling session held pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 52500.1.

(d) Enrollment of a high school pupil in an adult education program, course, or class shall be for sound educational purposes, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) The adult education program, course, or class is not offered in the regular high school curriculum.

(2) The adult education program, course, or class is needed by the pupil to make up deficient credits for graduation from high school.

(3) The adult education program, course, or class allows the pupil to gain vocational and technical skills beyond that provided by the regular high school’s vocational and technical education program.

(4) The adult education program, course, or class supplements and enriches the high school pupil’s educational experience.

(e) A high school pupil shall not be enrolled for apportionment purposes in an adult education program, course, or class that would be considered any of the following:

(1) Physical education.

(2) Driver’s training and education.

(3) Visual and performing arts.

(4) Band.

(5) Preparation of a school yearbook or school newspaper.

(6) Training for, or participation in, athletic camps,
 cheerleading or spirit organizations, student government, or extracurricular student clubs.

 (f) The Superintendent shall issue a program advisory that further defines the purposes set forth in subdivision (d) and the courses set forth in subdivision (e). The Superintendent is authorized to issue, at any time, rules and regulations instead of the program advisory.

(g) Money under the Adult Education Program, established pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 84900) of Chapter 5 of Part 50 of Division 7 of Title 3, shall not be used to support the costs of an adult education program, course, and class described in subdivision (e). A school district shall clearly demonstrate that the costs of instruction for pupils under 18 years of age enrolled in an adult education program, course, or class described in subdivision (e) are from another allowable fund source or sources.

(h) Students enrolled in adult education programs, courses, and classes shall be assigned a statewide student identifier consistent with the identifiers assigned to pupils in K–12 education programs, if the student is not already identified by a social security number in the data system of the adult school or other local educational agency providing the adult education programs, courses, or classes. Adult schools shall share the assigned identifiers with the California Community Colleges for inclusion in the student data system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 67.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52524.

(a) The department, in conjunction with the chancellor’s office, as part of the report and recommendations required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 84830, shall jointly develop and issue assessment policy recommendations regarding assessments to be used by school districts and community college districts for purposes of placement in adult education courses offered pursuant to Section 84830.

(b) The department and the chancellor’s office, as a
 part of the report and recommendations required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 84830, shall jointly develop and issue policy recommendations to the Legislature regarding a comprehensive accountability system for adult education courses offered pursuant to Sections 41976 and 84757. The department and the chancellor’s office shall develop recommendations for all adult education-funded providers for assessment, evaluation, and data collection to document participant outcomes and placement, and other measures they deem appropriate. Accountability measures may include receipt of a secondary school diploma or its recognized equivalent, placement in a postsecondary educational institution, training, and employment. All funded programs shall be required to annually submit demographic and other student-level outcome information to the department or the chancellor’s office, as
 appropriate.

(c) The department, in conjunction with the chancellor’s office, and as a part of the report and recommendations required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 84830, shall coordinate and issue both of the following:

(1) Recommendations, including recommendations as to whether or not fees should be assessed, and fee policy guidelines to be used by school districts and community college districts regarding the authority to charge fees for courses offered pursuant to Section 84830. With respect to these recommendations and guidelines, it is the intent of the Legislature that:

(A) Registration and course fees should be equivalent across all programs.

(B) Fees should not generate income beyond the cost of providing the courses.

(C) Fees should not create a barrier to student access to adult education programs.

(2) Recommendations and policy guidelines regarding the use of a single student identifier to be used by school districts and community college districts for purposes of developing a comprehensive accountability system pursuant to the requirements of Section 84830.

(d) As used in this section, “chancellor’s office” means the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 545, Sec. 1.   (SB 173)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Adult English Classes [52540. - 52540.]

52540.

Upon application of 20 or more persons above 18 years of age residing in a high school district who cannot speak, read, or write the English language to a degree of proficiency equal to that required for the completion of grade 8 of the elementary schools, the governing board of the high school district shall establish classes in English. These classes may be offered directly by the high school district or in partnership with another public adult education provider.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 70.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Classes in Citizenship [52550. - 52555.]

52550.

In counties in which the U.S. district courts are located, the superintendent of schools of the county or city and county shall obtain monthly from the clerk of the U.S. district court the names and addresses of all persons filing their declarations of intention to become citizens of the United States or their petitions for naturalization.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52551.

The superintendent of schools of the county or city and county, after obtaining the names and addresses of the applicants, shall send a written or printed notice to the applicants, stating that this article authorizes the governing board of any school district to establish upon application classes in training for citizenship. The form of this notice shall be furnished by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52552.

Upon application of 25 or more persons desiring training for citizenship and residing in a high school district, the governing board of the high school district shall establish special classes in training for citizenship. Upon demand, the governing board of the high school district may establish the classes with a lesser number of applicants. These classes may be offered directly by the high school district or in partnership with another public adult education provider.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 75.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52555.

The course of study in training for citizenship shall consist of the teaching of U.S. history, state and community civics, and the Constitution of the United States, with special reference to those sections in the Constitution which relate directly to the duties, privileges, and rights of the individual, and such allied subjects, including English for foreigners, or activities as will properly prepare the applicants to understand and assume the responsibilities of citizenship.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Handicapped Adults [52570. - 52572.]

52570.

The governing board of a school district maintaining secondary schools or a county superintendent of schools, shall have the power, with the approval of the department, to establish special classes for adults designed to serve the educational needs of adults with disabilities. These classes shall be directed to providing instruction in civic education, career technical education, work readiness, independent living skills, community access and integration, communication and social skills, literacy, and academics. These classes shall conform to standards of attendance, curriculum, and administration established by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 79.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52572.

The governing board of a school district or the county superintendent of schools authorized by this article to establish special classes for adults designed to serve the educational needs of adults with disabilities may contract to provide those classes by any adjacent high school district or unified school district, subject to the approval of the Superintendent. Any contract entered into pursuant to this section shall be for a term of not to exceed one year but may be renewed or revised and renewed annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 81.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Finances [52610. - 52616.18.]

52610.

“Adult,” for purposes of this section, means a person 18 years of age or older or a person who is not concurrently enrolled in a regular high school program. However, persons 18 years of age or older who are concurrently enrolled in a regular high school program are not adults for purposes of this section. Adults enrolled in any classes maintained by high school or unified school districts or county superintendents of schools pursuant to Sections 52300 through 52330, 8530, 8531, 8532, and 8533 shall be reported separately, and the adult foundation program shall be used in computing district apportionments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

52610.5.

Notwithstanding Section 52610, any minor, regardless of age, who is pregnant or is a parent actively engaged in raising one or more of the minor’s children, is eligible to enroll in any adult education course or class described in Section 41976. Money under the Adult Education Program, established pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 84900) of Chapter 5 of Part 50 of Division 7 of Title 3, shall not be used to support the costs of adult education courses or classes described in Section 41976. A school district shall clearly demonstrate that the costs of instruction for persons under 18 years of age enrolled in an adult education course or class described in Section 41976 are from another allowable fund source or sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 82.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52612.

(a) Except as specified in this section, the governing board of the school district maintaining the class may require an adult enrolled in a class for adults to pay a fee for the class. Except as specified in Section 52613, the governing board of a school district shall not impose a charge of any kind for a class in English and citizenship or a class in an elementary subject. A fee charge shall not be made
 for a class designated by the governing board as a class for which high school credit is granted when the class is taken by a person who does not hold a high school diploma. The total of the fees required and revenues derived from average daily attendance shall not exceed the estimated cost of all such classes maintained, including the reserves authorized by Section 52501.5.

(b) All textbooks and classroom materials furnished without charge under this section may also be offered for sale at the school bookstore.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the governing board of a school district may charge a fee for a class in English and citizenship until July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 606, Sec. 2.   (AB 189)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

52613.

(a) Notwithstanding any section to the contrary, each governing board of a school district maintaining classes for adults that issues a Certificate of Eligibility for Nonimmigrant (F-1) Student Status - For Academic and Language Students, Form I-20AB, or completes Form I-20AB for a person described in subparagraph (F)(i) of paragraph (15) of subsection (a) of Section 1101 of Title 8 of the United States Code, for the purposes of enrolling that person in a class in English and citizenship for foreigners or a class in an elementary subject, shall charge that person a fee to cover the full costs of instruction, but in no case shall the fee exceed the actual cost of the instruction. The fee shall be
 adopted at a regular meeting of the governing board of each of these school districts maintaining classes for adults at least 90 days prior to the commencement of the classes for which the fee is charged.

(b) No district maintaining classes for adults shall include the attendance of F-1 visa students enrolled in a class in English and citizenship for foreigners or in a class in elementary subjects for apportionment purposes.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 318, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 18.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Superseded by amendment by Stats. 2017, Ch. 69, only if it becomes operative on or before January 20, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

52613.

(a) Notwithstanding any section to the contrary, each governing board of a school district maintaining classes for adults that issues a Certificate of Eligibility for Nonimmigrant (F-1) Student Status - For Academic and Language Students, Form I-20AB, or completes Form I-20AB for a nonimmigrant foreign national, as defined in subparagraph (F)(i) of paragraph (15) of subsection (a) of Section 1101 of Title 8 of the United States Code, for the purposes of enrolling the nonimmigrant foreign national in a class in English and citizenship for foreigners or a class in an elementary subject, shall charge the nonimmigrant foreign national a fee to cover the full costs of instruction, but in no case shall the fee exceed the actual cost of the instruction. The fee shall be adopted at a regular meeting of the governing board of each of these school districts maintaining classes for adults at least
 90 days before the commencement of the classes for which the fee is charged.

(b) No school district maintaining classes for adults shall include the attendance of F-1 visa students enrolled in a class in English and citizenship for foreigners or in a class in elementary subjects for apportionment purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 69, Sec. 5.   (AB 1850)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative only if the condition in Sec. 10 of Ch. 69 is satisfied on or before January 20, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

52616.

Money derived under the Adult Education Program, established pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 84900) of Chapter 5 of Part 50 of Division 7 of Title 3, shall be deposited in a separate fund of the school district to be known as the “adult education fund.” Money in the school district’s adult education fund shall be expended only for adult education purposes. Except for moneys received pursuant to the local control funding formula, moneys received for programs for specifically designated pupils shall not be expended for adult education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 85.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52616.4.

(a) Money in the Adult Education Fund of a school district may be expended only for the following charges:

(1) Direct instructional costs relating directly to the adult education program, including, but not limited to, the salaries and benefits of adult education teachers and aides, textbooks, instructional supplies, travel and conference expenses for employees who work in the adult education program, and repair, maintenance, acquisition, and replacement of instructional equipment used in the adult education program.

(2) (A) Direct support costs for the adult education program. For purposes of this section, “direct support costs”
 means:

(i) Instructional administration and instructional media costs that are supported by auditable documentation. For purposes of this subparagraph, instructional administration costs include the documented costs of individuals who, regardless of specific job title, administer the district’s adult education program.

(ii) School administration and pupil services costs that are supported by auditable documentation and that represent the activities of individuals whose employment by the school district is exclusively in support of the adult education program, or school administration and pupil services costs that are supported by auditable documentation and that meet all of the following conditions:

(I) Those costs are able to be identified in a separate contract with the adult education program.

(II) The administration and services are provided exclusively to adult students and only for the period identified in the contract made pursuant to subclause (I).

(III) The services are provided during a time that is different than when services to pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, are provided, and the administration is provided after 4:00 p.m.

(IV) The persons who provide the services and administration to adult students report to the adult education director during the period of the contract made pursuant to subclause (I).

(V) The person providing the administration immediately supervises the adult school personnel.

(iii) Plant maintenance and operations costs,
 including costs for facilities that are used to provide childcare services to the children of the students attending the adult education program at a particular site as follows:

(I) For facilities that exclusively house adult education programs, the costs that are supported by auditable documentation. For purposes of this clause, a facility that houses an adult education program and a regional occupational center or program or a childcare program, or both, is a facility that exclusively houses an adult education program.

(II) For facilities that are used by more than one program, including the adult education program, a district may charge the Adult Education Fund for an amount attributable to the adult education program, but this charge shall not exceed the amount derived from the following calculation:

(ia) Calculate, according to the general description in the California School Accounting Manual, the prorated number of classroom units that the adult education program uses for instructional and childcare purposes.

(ib) Calculate the total number of classroom units in the district.

(ic) Divide the amount calculated in sub-subclause (ia) by the amount calculated in sub-subclause (ib).

(id) Multiply the quotient calculated in sub-subclause (ic) by the district’s total plant maintenance and operations costs.

(iv) Facilities costs for nondistrict-owned facilities that exclusively house adult education programs, including, but not limited to, costs of facilities that are used to provide childcare services to the children of the students